Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3843
(UTC 417) Combination and division of trusts.

(UTC 417) After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, a trustee may combine two or more trusts into a single trust or divide a trust into two or more separate trusts, if the result does not impair rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect achievement of the purposes of the trust.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 43.